Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 3

Membership Camping Act

66-32-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Membership Camping Act.”

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 1; T.C.A., §47-18-401.

Compiler's Notes. This part was transferred from title 47, ch. 18, part 4 in 1995.

Cross-References. Time-share programs, title 66, ch. 32, part 1.

66-32-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Advertisement” means any written, printed, verbal, or visual offer;

“Blanket encumbrance” means any mortgage, deed of trust, option to purchase, vendor's lien or interest under a contract or agreement of sale, or other material financing lien or encumbrance granted by the membership camping operator, which secures or evidences the obligation to pay money or to sell or convey any campgrounds located in this state made available to purchasers by the membership camping operator or any portion thereof and which authorizes, permits, or requires the foreclosure or other disposition of the campground affected;

“Campground” means real property owned or operated by a membership camping operator which is available for camping by purchasers of membership camping contracts;

“Camping site” means a space designed and promoted for the purpose of locating a trailer, tent, tent trailer, pickup camper, or other similar device used for camping;

“Facilities” means the following amenities provided and located on property owned or operated by a membership camping operator: camping sites, rental trailers or cabins, swimming pools, sport courts, recreation buildings, and trading posts or grocery stores;

“Holder” includes the seller who acquires a membership camping contract or, if the contract is purchased, a financing agency or other assignee that purchases the contract;

“Membership camping contract” means an agreement offered or sold within this state evidencing a purchaser's title to, interest in, right or license to use, for more than thirty (30) days, the campgrounds and facilities of a membership camping operator and includes a membership which provides for this use;

“Membership camping operator” means any enterprise, other than one that is tax exempt under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), as amended, that solicits membership camping contracts paid for by a fee or periodic payments and has as one (1) of its purposes camping or outdoor recreation including use of camping sites primarily by purchasers;

“Nondisturbance agreement” means an instrument by which the holder of a blanket encumbrance agrees that:

Its rights in any campground made available to purchasers by the membership camping operator shall be subordinate to the rights of purchasers from and after the recordation of the instrument;

The holder and all successors and assignees, and any person who acquires the campground through foreclosure or by deed in lieu of foreclosure of such blanket encumbrance, shall take the campground subject to the rights of purchasers; and

The holder or any successor acquiring the campground through the blanket encumbrance shall not use or cause the campground to be used in a manner which would materially prevent purchasers from using or occupying the campground in a manner contemplated by the purchasers' membership camping contracts; provided, that the holder shall have no obligation or liability to assume the responsibilities or obligations of the membership camping operator under membership camping contracts;

“Offer” means any solicitation reasonably designed to result in the entering into of a membership camping contract;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, company, and any other form of multiple organization for carrying on foreign or domestic business, other than a government or a subdivision of a government;

“Purchaser” means a person who enters into a membership camping contract and obtains the right to use the camping or outdoor facilities of a membership camping operator;

“Reciprocal program” means any arrangement allowing purchasers to use camping sites, facilities, or other properties owned or operated by any person other than the membership camping operator with whom the purchaser has entered into a membership camping contract;

“Sale” or “sell” means entering into, or other disposition, of a membership camping contract for value, but the term “value” does not include a fee to offset the reasonable costs of transfer of a membership camping contract; and

“Seller” means a membership camping operator.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 2; T.C.A., §47-18-402.

66-32-303. Disclosures to purchasers.

A membership camping operator shall disclose the following information to a purchaser before the purchaser signs a membership camping contract or gives any money or thing of value for the purchase of a membership camping contract. The disclosures shall be delivered to the purchaser prior to the time the contract is signed and may be presented in any format selected by the membership camping operator. The disclosures may be included in or as part of the contract at the option of the membership camping operator and shall clearly communicate all of the following as of a date no more than one (1) year prior to the date of purchase:

The name and address of the principal place of business of the membership camping operator and any material affiliate of the membership camping operator;

A brief description of the membership camping operator's experience in the membership camping business, including the number of years the membership camping operator has been in the membership camping business;

A brief description of the nature of the purchaser's right or license to use the membership camping operator's campground or facilities;

The location of each of the membership camping operator's campgrounds and a brief description of the significant facilities at each campground then available for use by purchasers and those which are represented to purchasers as being planned, together with a brief description of any facilities that are or will be available to nonpurchasers or nonmembers.

“Significant facilities” includes, but is not limited to, each of the following: the number of campsites in each park; the number of campsites in each park with full or partial hookups; swimming pools; tennis courts; recreation buildings; restrooms and showers; laundry rooms; trading posts; or grocery stores; and

“Partial hookups” means those hookups with at least one (1) of the following connections: electricity, water, or sewer connections;

A brief description of the membership camping operator's ownership of, or other right to use, the campgrounds represented to be available for use by purchasers, together with the duration of any material lease, license, franchise, or reciprocal agreement entitling the membership camping operator to use the campground, and any material provisions of any agreements which restrict a purchaser's use of the campground;

A summary or copy of the rules, restrictions, or covenants regulating the purchaser's use of the membership camping operator's campgrounds, including a statement of whether and how the rules, restrictions, or covenants may be changed;

A description of any restraints on the transfer of the membership camping contract;

A brief description of the policies relating to the availability of camping sites and whether reservations are required;

A brief description of any grounds for forfeiture of a purchaser's membership camping contract;

A brief description of all payments of a purchaser under a membership camping contract, including initial fees and any further fees, charges, or assessments, together with any provisions for changing the payments;

A copy of the membership camping contract signed by the purchaser;

A statement of the purchaser's right to cancel the membership camping contract as provided in § 66-32-304;

A description of the manner in which the membership camping operator has complied or proposes to comply with § 66-32-307;

A description of any liens, defects, or encumbrances on or affecting the title to the membership contracts or to the campgrounds;

A statement of the amount, or a statement that there is no amount, included in the budget as a reserve for repairs and replacement;

The projected common expense liability, if any, by category of expenditures for the members;

Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser at closing, together with a description of the purpose and method of calculating the fee;

A description of the insurance coverage, or a statement that there is no insurance coverage, provided for the benefit of members; and

A statement of the means, including all financial arrangements, by which the developer proposes to assure the completion of all promised improvements.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 3; T.C.A., §47-18-403.

66-32-304. Cancellation of contracts.

Any membership camping contract may be cancelled at the option of the purchaser by personally delivering or sending written notice of the cancellation to the membership camping operator at the address shown in the contract. The notice must be posted not later than twelve o'clock midnight (12:00) of the fifteenth calendar day following the day on which the membership camping contract was signed, if the purchaser did not make an on-site inspection of the campground, or the tenth calendar day following the day on which the membership camping contract was signed, if the purchaser did make an on-site inspection of the campground.

The purchaser's cancellation right shall be set forth in bold type in the membership camping contract in close proximity to the purchaser's signature line.

Within thirty (30) days after the membership camping operator receives a notice of cancellation, and provided that the purchaser's check, if any, has been cleared by the purchaser's bank, the membership camping operator shall refund to the purchaser any deposit, down payment or other payment therefor.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 4; T.C.A., §47-18-404.

Cross-References. Waiver of provisions of section void, §66-32-312.

66-32-305. Inducements — Disclosures.

It is unlawful for any person by any means, as part of an advertising program, to offer any item of value as an inducement to the recipient to visit a membership camping operator's campground, attend a sales presentation, or contact a salesperson, unless the person clearly discloses in writing in the offer, in readily understandable language, each of the following:

The name and street address of the membership camping operator;

A general statement that the advertising program is made by a membership camping operator and the purpose of any requested visit, including, but not limited to, the intent to offer a sales presentation, and that an attempt will be made to induce the person to incur a monetary obligation, including the amount of any monetary obligation;

A statement of the odds, in Arabic numerals, of receiving each item offered, plus a statement, in Arabic numerals, of the number of offers on which those odds are based, and a statement, if applicable, that those offers are not exclusive to the property within named;

The approximate verifiable retail value of each item offered, which means the price at which the person offering the item can substantiate that a substantial number of these items have been sold at retail by another person or, in the event such substantiation is unavailable, no more than three (3) times the amount actually paid by the sponsor or promoter for the item and a statement that the recipient shall be allowed to choose either the item offered or cash in an amount equal to the retail value of the item, as such value is represented within the written offer; and

All restrictions, qualifications, and other conditions that must be satisfied before the recipient is entitled to receive the item, including:

Any deadline by which the recipient must visit the campground, attend the sales presentation, or respond in order to receive the item;

The approximate duration of any normal sales presentation and tour;

Any other conditions, such as a minimum age qualification, a financial qualification, or a requirement that if the recipient is married both husband and wife must be present in order to receive the item; and

All other materials, rules, terms, and conditions of the offer or program.

It is unlawful to make receipt of an offered prize contingent upon consent by the individual winners to allow their names to be used for promotional purposes.

It is unlawful to use the names of individual winners for a promotional purpose in connection with a mailing to a third person before obtaining their express written or oral consent to such use.

It is unlawful for any person making an offer subject to subsection (a), or any employee or agent of the person, to offer any item if the person knows or has reason to know that the offered item will not be available in a sufficient quantity based on the reasonably anticipated response to the offer.

It is unlawful for any person making an offer subject to subsection (a), or any employee or agent of the person, to fail to provide any offered item or to fail to provide cash, if chosen by the recipient, in an amount equal to the retail value of the item, as such value is represented within the written offer, which any recipient who has responded to the offer is entitled to receive. The recipient shall be allowed to choose either the item offered or the cash.

If the person making an offer subject to subsection (a) is unable to provide an offered item because of limitations of supply, quantity, or quality not reasonably foreseeable or controllable by the person making the offer and the recipient does not choose to accept cash in an amount equal to the retail value of the item, as such value is represented within the written offer, the person making the offer shall inform the recipient of the recipient's right to receive a rain check for the item offered, or shall inform the recipient of the recipient's right to at least one (1) of the following additional options:

The person making the offer will provide a like item of equivalent or greater verifiable retail value or a rain check for the item. This option must be offered if the offered item is not reasonably available;

The person making the offer will provide a substitute item of equivalent or greater verifiable retail value.

If a rain check is provided, the person making an offer subject to subsection (a) shall, within a reasonable time, and in no event more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the raincheck is provided, deliver the agreed item to the recipient's address without additional cost or obligation to the recipient, unless the item for which the rain check is provided remains unavailable because of limitations of supply, quantity, or quality not reasonably foreseeable or controllable by the person making the offer. If the item is unavailable for these reasons, the person shall, not more than thirty (30) days after the expiration of the one-hundred-twenty-day period, deliver a like item of equal or greater value. The recipient has thirty (30) days from receipt of the delivered item to return the item and request cash in an amount equal to the retail value as represented within the written offer or the retail value represented of any substitute item offered, whichever is greater. The person making the offer shall provide payment within ten (10) days from return of the item.

On the request of a recipient who has received or claims a right to receive any offered item, the person making an offer subject to subsection (a) shall show the recipient sufficient evidence verifying that the item provided matches the item randomly or otherwise selected for distribution to that recipient.

It is unlawful for any person making an offer subject to subsection (a), or any employee or agent of the person, to:

Misrepresent the size, quantity, or identity of any prize, gift, money, or other item of value offered;

Misrepresent in any material manner the odds of receiving any particular gift, prize, amount of money, or other item of value;

Label any offer a “notice of termination” or “notice of cancellation”;

Misrepresent, through omission or in any other material manner, the offer or program;

Represent or lead a person to believe that the person is or could be a winner if the person had not won or is not eligible to win; or

Represent or lead a person to believe that the person has been “selected” or is otherwise part of a select or special group when the person has not been selected or is not part of a select or special group.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 5; 1991, ch. 82, §§ 1-5; 1991, ch. 83, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §47-18-405.

66-32-306. Purchasers' remedies.

A purchaser's remedy for errors in or omissions from the membership camping contract and related materials delivered to the purchaser at the time of sale or any of the disclosures required in § 66-32-305 is limited to a right of rescission and refund of the purchase price paid by the purchaser. This limitation does not apply to errors or omissions from the contract or disclosures or other requirements of this part which are a part of a scheme to willfully misstate or omit the information required.

Reasonable attorney fees shall be awarded to the prevailing party in any action under this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 6; T.C.A., §47-18-406.

66-32-307. Prerequisites to selling membership camping contracts.

With respect to any campground in this state acquired and put into operation by a membership camping operator after July 1, 1985, the membership camping operator shall not sell membership camping contracts in this state granting the right to use such campground until one (1) of the following requirements has been satisfied:

Each person holding an interest in a blanket encumbrance shall have executed and delivered a nondisturbance agreement and such agreement shall have been recorded in the real estate records of the county in which the campground is located;

The financial institution providing the major hypothecation loan to the membership camping operator, the “hypothecation lender”, shall have a lien on, or security interest in, the membership camping operator's interest in the campground, and the hypothecation lender shall have executed and delivered a nondisturbance agreement and recorded such agreement in the real estate records of the county in which the campground is located. In addition, each person holding an interest in a blanket encumbrance superior to the interest held by the hypothecation lender shall have executed, delivered, and recorded an instrument stating that such person shall give the hypothecation lender notice of, and at least thirty (30) days to cure, any default under the blanket encumbrance before such person commences any foreclosure action affecting the campground. For the purposes of this provision, a major hypothecation loan to a membership camping operator is a loan or line of credit secured by substantially all of the contracts receivable arising from the membership camping operator's sale of membership camping contracts;

In the event the membership camping operator is selling real estate to purchasers, each person holding an interest in a blanket encumbrance shall have executed and delivered an agreement providing for periodic releases from the blanket encumbrance as real estate sales fees are paid on the debt. However, in such case, the membership camping operator shall have obtained an irrevocable letter of credit or surety bonds in favor of the holder of the blanket encumbrance insuring the completion of the roads and structural amenities which are promised for the project now being developed; or

The membership campground operator whose project is subject to an underlying blanket lien or encumbrance may obtain the agreement of the lienholder to take the project, in the event of default by the developer, subject to the rights of the nondefaulting purchasers by posting a bond equal to fifty percent (50%) of the amount owed to the lienholder, making an assignment of receivables equal to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the principal amounts due to the lienholder, pledging collateral security equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount owed to the lienholder or entering into any other financing plan or escrow agreement acceptable to the lienholder.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 7; T.C.A., §47-18-407.

66-32-308. Violations — Penalties.

Any person who willfully violates this part commits a misdemeanor. It is a misdemeanor for any person in connection with the offer or sale of any camping club contracts willfully to:

Make any untrue or misleading statement of a material fact, or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading;

Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud; or

Engage in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person.

No indictment or information may be returned under this part more than two (2) years after the alleged violation.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 8; T.C.A., §47-18-408.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§39-11-114,40-35-110,40-35-111.

Cross-References. Penalty for misdemeanor, §§39-11-114,40-35-111.

66-32-309. Exemptions.

This part shall not apply to:

Mobile home parks or camping or recreational trailer parks which are open to the general public and do not solicit purchases of membership camping contracts, but rather contain only camping sites rented for per use fee;

Any person who engages in the business of arranging and selling reciprocal programs and who does not own campgrounds and facilities; or

Sales of time-share intervals in a time-share project which is registered under the Tennessee Time-Share Act, compiled in part 1 of this chapter.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 9; T.C.A., §47-18-409.

66-32-310. Violation of Tennessee Consumer Protection Act.

A violation of this part shall constitute a violation of the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1. For the purpose of application of the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act, any violation of this part shall be construed to constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice affecting the conduct of any trade or commerce.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 10; T.C.A., §47-18-410.

66-32-311. Retail Installment Sales Act applicable.

Membership camping contracts covered by this part shall be subject to the Tennessee Retail Installment Sales Act, compiled in title 47, chapter 11.

Acts 1985, ch. 303, § 11; T.C.A., §47-18-411.

66-32-312. Void agreement — Waiver of cancellation provisions.

Any contractual agreement containing a waiver of §66-32-304 is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

Acts 1990, ch. 804, § 1; T.C.A., §47-18-412.